Oklahoma, session 2025, SB1013.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 85A O.S. 2021, Section 5, is


amended to read as follows:


Section 5. A. The rights and remedies granted to an employee


subject to the provisions of the Administrative Workers’


Compensation Act shall be exclusive of all other rights and remedies


of the employee, his legal representative, dependents, next of kin,


or anyone else claiming rights to recovery on behalf of the employee


against the employer, including a general contractor that provides


workers’ compensation insurance coverage to a subcontractor pursuant


to Section 2 of this act, or any principal, officer, director,


employee, stockholder, partner, or prime contractor of the employer

Req. No. 327 Page 1


on account of injury, illness, or death. Negligent acts of a co-


employee may not be imputed to the employer. No role, capacity, or


persona of any employer, principal, officer, director, employee, or


stockholder other than that existing in the role of employer of the


employee shall be relevant for consideration for purposes of this


act, and the remedies and rights provided by this act shall be


exclusive regardless of the multiple roles, capacities, or personas


the employer may be deemed to have.


B. Exclusive remedy shall not apply if:


1. An employer fails to secure the payment of compensation due


to the employee as required by this act. An injured employee, or


his or her legal representative in case death results from the


injury, may, at his or her option, elect to claim compensation under


this act or to maintain a legal action in court for damages on


account of the injury or death; or


2. The injury was caused by an intentional tort committed by


the employer. An intentional tort shall exist only when the


employee is injured as a result of willful, deliberate, specific


intent of the employer to cause such injury. Allegations or proof


that the employer had knowledge that the injury was substantially


certain to result from the employer’s conduct shall not constitute


an intentional tort. The employee shall plead facts that show it is


at least as likely as it is not that the employer acted with the



Req. No. 327 Page 2


purpose of injuring the employee. The issue of whether an act is an


intentional tort shall be a question of law.


C. The immunity from civil liability described in subsection A


of this section shall apply regardless of whether the injured


employee is denied compensation or deemed ineligible to receive


compensation under this act.


D. If an employer has failed to secure the payment of


compensation for his or her injured employee as provided for in this


act, an injured employee, or his or her legal representative if


death results from the injury, may maintain an action in the


district court for damages on account of such injury.


E. The immunity created by the provisions of this section shall


not extend to action against another employer, or its employees, on


the same job as the injured or deceased worker where such other


employer does not stand in the position of an intermediate or


principal employer to the immediate employer of the injured or


deceased worker.


F. The immunity created by the provisions of this section shall


not extend to action against another employer, or its employees, on


the same job as the injured or deceased worker even though such


other employer may be considered as standing in the position of a


special master of a loaned servant where such special master neither


is the immediate employer of the injured or deceased worker nor



Req. No. 327 Page 3


stands in the position of an intermediate or principal employer to


the immediate employer of the injured or deceased worker.


G. This section shall not be construed to abrogate the loaned


servant doctrine in any respect other than that described in


subsection F of this section. Nothing in this act shall be


construed to relieve the employer from any other penalty provided


for in this act for failure to secure the payment of compensation


under this act.


H. For the purpose of extending the immunity of this section,


any architect, professional engineer, or land surveyor shall be


deemed an intermediate or principal employer for services performed


at or on the site of a construction project, but this immunity shall


not extend to the negligent preparation of design plans and


specifications.


I. If the employer has failed to secure the payment of


compensation as provided in this act or in the case of an


intentional tort, the injured employee or his or her legal


representative may maintain an action either before the Commission


or in the district court, but not both.


SECTION 2. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 126 of Title 85A, unless there


is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:


A. For the purposes of this section:



Req. No. 327 Page 4


1. “General contractor” means a person who undertakes to


procure the performance of work or a service, either separately or


through the use of subcontractors. General contractor shall


include, but is not limited to, a principal contractor, an original


contractor, a prime contractor, and premises owners who contract all


or part of the work being performed on the premises;


2. “Provides workers’ compensation insurance coverage” means to


make available workers’ compensation insurance coverage. Workers’


compensation insurance coverage may be provided, even if it does not


ultimately cover an incident, so long as it was made available to


the subcontractor. Providing workers’ compensation insurance


coverage does not mean:


a. timing discrepancies between the issuance of workers’


compensation insurance policies and contracts between


and among general contractors and subcontractors,


b. factual discrepancies in secondary documentation such


as certificates of insurance or enrollment forms,


c. a general contractor’s lack of notice of election of


coverage, or


d. payment of premiums, or lack thereof, by the general


contractor; and


3. “Subcontractor” means a person who contracts with a general


contractor to perform all or part of the work or services that the


general contractor has undertaken to perform.

Req. No. 327 Page 5


B. A general contractor and a subcontractor may enter into a


written agreement under which the general contractor provides


workers’ compensation insurance coverage to the subcontractor and


employees of the subcontractor.


C. If a general contractor has workers’ compensation insurance


to protect the general contractor’s employees and if, in the course


and scope of the general contractor’s business, the general


contractor enters into a contract with a subcontractor who does not


have employees, the general contractor shall be treated as the


employer of the subcontractor for the purposes of the Administrative


Workers’ Compensation Act and may enter into an agreement for the


deduction of premiums paid in accordance with subsection C of this


section. A premises owner who acts as a general contractor shall be


treated as the employer of all subcontractors for the purposes of


the Administrative Workers’ Compensation Act and may enter into an


agreement for the deduction of premiums paid in accordance with


subsection C of this section.


D. If a general contractor elects to provide coverage, then the


actual premiums based on payroll that are paid or incurred by the


general contractor for the coverage may be deducted from the


contract price or other amount owed to the subcontractor by the


general contractor.


E. An agreement under this section makes the general contractor


the employer of the subcontractor and the subcontractor’s employees

Req. No. 327 Page 6


for the purposes of this title. A subcontractor or subcontractor’s


employee’s rights and remedies against the general contractor shall


be subject to the limitations pursuant to Section 5 of Title 85A of


the Oklahoma Statutes.


F. Notwithstanding subsection B of this section, a person who


performs work or provides a service for an oil or gas well operator


and who is an independent contractor with employees is not entitled


to coverage under the general contractor’s workers’ compensation


insurance policy unless the independent subcontractor and the


general contractor enter into an agreement under this section.


SECTION 3. This act shall become effective November 1, 2025.




60-1-327 CAD 1/16/2025 2:24:12 PM























Req. No. 327 Page 7